Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 11. Alaska Family Education Loan Program.

Sec. 14.43.710.
Program established.

The Alaska family education loan program is established to provide low interest loans to families to assist in paying the costs of postsecondary education for family members.

History.

(§ 17 ch 92 SLA 1987)

Administrative Code. —

For family education loan program, see 20 AAC 15, art. 7.

Sec. 14.43.720.
Family education loan account.

The family education loan account is created within the education loan fund (AS

14.42.210

). The account shall be used to make family education loans to families selected under AS

14.43.710

—

14.43.750

, to pay the costs of collecting family education loans that are in default if those costs are not recovered from the family, and to pay the costs of administering the account. Unless the instrument evidencing the family education loan has been sold or assigned to the Alaska Student Loan Corporation, repayments of principal and interest on family education loans shall be paid into the family education loan account. If estimated funds available from family education loan repayments are inadequate to fully fund estimated family education loans in a fiscal year, additional funding from the general fund may be requested and appropriated for that year.

The commission may sell or assign notes and other instruments evidencing family education loans to the Alaska Student Loan Corporation and enter into agreements with the corporation relating to loans, the administration of the education loan fund created under AS

14.42.210

, and the payment of and security for bonds of the corporation. Proceeds from the sale or assignment of notes and other instruments shall be deposited in the family education loan account.

History.

(§ 17 ch 92 SLA 1987; am § 26 ch 43 SLA 1991; am § 10 ch 54 SLA 1997; am § 36 ch 85 SLA 2001)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2001, in accordance with § 45, ch. 85, SLA 2001, “education loan fund” was substituted for “student loan fund” in subsection (b).

Administrative Code. —

For family education loan program, see 20 AAC 15, art. 7.

Sec. 14.43.730.
Administration. [Repealed, § 42 ch 85 SLA 2001.]

Sec. 14.43.740.
Loan terms, limits, and conditions.

The provisions of AS

14.43.100

,

14.43.120(a)

— (c), (m), and (r) — (u),

14.43.122

,

14.43.135

,

14.43.145

—

14.43.155

,

14.43.173

, and

14.43.910

—

14.43.990

apply to a loan made under AS

14.43.710

—

14.43.750

.

[Repealed, § 18 ch 54 SLA 1997.]

The corporation shall set the interest rate on a loan made under AS

14.43.710

—

14.43.750

, but the annual rate may not exceed 8.25 percent.

Repayment of the principal and interest on a loan made under AS

14.43.710

—

14.43.750

begins on the first of the month immediately following loan disbursement. The loan may be cancelled without prejudice at any time before actual disbursement. The loan shall provide for repayment of the total amount owed in periodic installments in not more than 10 years from the commencement of repayment. If the commission and the borrower agree to a different repayment schedule, the borrower shall repay the loan in accordance with the agreement.

Provision shall be made for payment by the borrower of fees and costs incurred in collection of delinquent or defaulted loans.

The commission may withhold disbursement of a loan if the borrower or family member is no longer eligible under AS

14.43.750

.

[Repealed, § 45 ch 89 SLA 2014.]

History.

(§ 17 ch 92 SLA 1987; am § 2 ch 44 SLA 1991; am § 43 ch 63 SLA 1993; am § 8 ch 112 SLA 1994; am § 21 ch 5 SLA 1996; am §§ 11 — 14, 18 ch 54 SLA 1997; am §§ 26, 27 ch 63 SLA 2004; am § 2 ch 7 SLA 2009; am §§ 38, 45 ch 89 SLA 2014)

Cross references. —

For provision prescribing the applicability of the 2009 amendment of (c) of this section to the interest rate of a loan that is subject to this section on or after July 1, 2009, see § 3, ch. 7, SLA 2009, in the 2009 Temporary and Special Acts.
For ability of the Alaska Student Loan Corporation to adopt emergency regulations under AS

44.62.250

to implement the 2009 repeal and reenactment of (c) of this section, see § 4, ch. 7, SLA 2009, in the 2009 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For family education loan program, see 20 AAC 15, art. 7.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective May 1, 2009, rewrote subsection (c).

The 2014 amendment, effective July 17, 2014, in (a), inserted the citation to AS

14.43.173

, and made a related change; repealed (g).

Editor’s notes. —

Section 3, ch. 44, SLA 1991 provides that “this Act applies to principal and interest due on a loan entered into on or after July 1, 1990.”

Sec. 14.43.750.
Eligibility.

A person may apply for and obtain a family education loan on behalf of a family member if

the borrower and the family member

are residents of the state at the time of application for the loan; for purposes of this paragraph, a borrower and family member qualify as residents of the state if the borrower and the family member have been physically present in the state for at least one year immediately before the time of application for the loan with the intent to remain indefinitely or, if not physically present in the state, the borrower and family member have not declared or established residency in another state, intend to return permanently to the state, and the absence meets the requirements imposed under AS

14.43.125(a)(3)(C)(i)

— (vi);

satisfy the requirements of AS

14.43.125(a)(6)

— (9);

the family member

is enrolled as a full-time student in a career education, associate, baccalaureate, or graduate degree program; or

is a graduate of a high school or the equivalent, or scheduled for graduation from a high school within six months, who, at the time of loan disbursement, will be enrolled in compliance with (A) of this paragraph; and

neither the borrower nor the family member

is delinquent or has ever been in default on a loan previously awarded by the commission unless the defaulted loan has been voluntarily paid in full;

is past due on a child support obligation established by court order or by the child support services agency under AS

25.27.160

—

25.27.220

at the time of application or loan disbursement;

has, within the previous five years, had a loan discharged or written off by the commission for any reason.

[Repealed, § 26 ch 5 SLA 1996.]

History.

(§ 17 ch 92 SLA 1987; am § 9 ch 112 SLA 1994; am § 26 ch 5 SLA 1996; am § 15 ch 54 SLA 1997; am § 3 ch 89 SLA 2002; am § 39 ch 89 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, “child support enforcement division” was changed to ‘child support services agency‘ in (a) of this section in accordance with § 12(a), ch. 107, SLA 2004, and to correct a manifest error.

Administrative Code. —

For family education loan program, see 20 AAC 15, art. 7.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective July 17, 2014, rewrote (a)(1), which read, “the borrower (A) is a resident of the state at the time of application for the loan; for purposes of this paragraph, a borrower qualifies as a resident of the state if the borrower has been physically present in the state for at least one year immediately before the time of application for the loan with the intent to remain indefinitely or, if not physically present in the state, the borrower has not declared or established residency in another state, intends to return permanently to the state, and the absence meets the requirements imposed under AS

14.43.125(a)(3)(C)(i)

— (vi); (B) satisfies the requirements of AS

14.43.125(a)(6)

— (9)”, in (a)(3)(A), added “unless the defaulted loan has been voluntarily paid in full” at the end.

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 6, ch. 89, SLA 2002, the 2002 amendment to subparagraph (a)(1)(B) applies to a person who applies for a family education loan on or after July 1, 2003.

Sec. 14.43.790.
Definitions. [Repealed, § 18 ch 54 SLA 1997.]